Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 33. Black River Union High District #39

Two Directors from Ludlow to be elected to serve until the second annual meeting of said Board.

Two Directors from Ludlow to be elected to serve until the third annual meeting of said Board.

Two Directors from Ludlow to be elected to serve until the fourth annual meeting of said Board.

One Director from Mount Holly to be elected to serve until the third annual meeting of said Board.

One Director from Mount Holly to be elected to serve until the fourth annual meeting of said Board.

(c)

Apportionment of expenses.
All classifications of expenditure accounts and all series numbers hereinafter referred are taken from “State Educational Records and Repots Series: Handbook II OE 22017,

Financial Accounting for Local and State School Systems,
Standard Receipt and Expenditure Accounts, U.S. Department of Health, Education, and Welfare, Office of Education” to which handbook reference is hereby made. The term ADM (average daily membership) shall be defined
as the average enrollment of resident pupils of the District attending the Union School for the first thirty (30) days of a school year in which school was actually in session; it is the quotient obtained by dividing by 30 the
aggregate membership of resident pupils in the school District during the first 30 days in which the school was actually in session, but excluding pupils whose education is paid for by the Department of Welfare and this includes,
but is not limited to, the children of a group foster home, educational programs, counseling and other creative and recreational programs for the purpose of serving underprivileged children.

Expenditure Accounts

The Union shall budget and pay its own expenses independently of the Ludlow Elementary School District, and the Ludlow Elementary School District shall budget and pay its own expenses independently of the Union. This includes all of the following accounts:
100 Administration, 200 Instruction, 300 Attendance Services, 640d Telephone and Telegraph, 820c Liability, 820d Fidelity Bond, 1000 Student Body Activities, 1100 Community Services, 1200 Capital Outlay, 1400 Outgoing Transfer,
and 730a Replacement of Instructional Equipment.

610b

Custodial services
shall be provided the Union by the Ludlow Elementary School District and all employees shall be exclusively employed by the Ludlow Elementary School District and shall be under the exclusive control of the Ludlow
Elementary School District.

620 The

contracted services
for the Black River High School building shall be allocated 100% to the Union and shall be allocated between the member districts on a per pupil basis using ADM.

The contracted services for the elementary school building, and industrial arts building and the yard areas, parking areas and playing fields appurtenant to all the above buildings, including the Black River High School building, shall be allocated between
the Union and Ludlow Elementary School District on a student-hour basis per school day using ADM, and shall be allocated between the member districts of the Union on a per pupil basis using ADM. This includes all of the following
accounts: 720b Building-Contracted Services, 720c Repair of Equipment-Contracted Services, 740b Other Expenses for Buildings, 740c Repair of Equipment-Other Expenses, 740d Manufacture of Replacement Equipment, 820a Property Insurance,
and 1300 Debt Service and 1200 Architectural Service — (Net after state aid).

400.

Health services
provided by the Union shall be allocated among the member districts on a per pupil basis using ADM. This includes all of the following accounts: 500 pupil Transportation Services, 650a Custodial Supplies 650b Supplies
— Operation of Vehicles, 650d Other Supplies — Operation of Plant, 630 Heat for Building, 640a Water and Sewage, 640b Electricity, 720a Grounds — Contracted Services, and 740a Other Expenses for Grounds.

810b Social Security — same as 100 series, except for professional personnel utilized by both the Union and the Ludlow Elementary School District for which costs shall be allocated on a student-hour basis per school day using ADM.

820b

Workman’s Compensation

The Union shall not assume the indebtedness of the proposed member Districts.

The Union shall not acquire any properties of the proposed member Districts. The union shall have exclusive use and possession of the Black River High School building in Ludlow, Vermont and also the nonexclusive use and possession, in common with the
Ludlow School District, of the elementary school building, industrial arts building and Black River High School gymnasium and yard areas, parking areas and playing fields appurtenant thereto in Ludlow, Vermont, all owned by the Ludlow
School District.

The allocation of capital and operating expenses of the Union among member districts shall be made in accordance with Appendix C.

Each proposed member District shall be entitled to one member on the Union School Board per fifty pupils or fraction thereof attending said Union School for said member District; provided however that, in the event this would result in a Board of more
than eighteen members, then and in that event said Board shall be limited to eighteen members, with each member school District being entitled to representation on said Board in the same proportion that students from said member District
represent to the total attendance of said Union School.

The term of office of each Director of the proposed union shall be for a period of three years; provided however that the initial Board shall be elected as follows:

(a)
Two Directors from Ludlow to be elected to serve until July 1, following the second annual meeting of said Board.

(b)
Two Directors from Ludlow to be elected to serve until July 1, following the third annual meeting of said Board.

(c)
Two Directors from Ludlow to be elected to serve until July 1, following the fourth annual meeting of said Board.

(d)
One Director from Mount Holly to be elected to serve until July 1, following the third annual meeting of said Board.

(e)
One Director from Mount Holly to be elected to serve until July 1, following the fourth annual meeting of said Board.

All students in the Mount Holly School District currently enrolled in a public school, other than the Black River High School in Ludlow, and entering grade level twelve in September, 1973, shall be permitted to continue in that school for the 1973-74
school year and shall not be included in ADM, as defined in Appendix C, for that year.

This Union proposal shall be submitted to the voters of the school Districts of Mount Holly and of Ludlow on , 1973.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1964
Groton, Ryegate and Wells River each voted yes on the following article:

Shall the School District join in the formation of a union school district, as provided by law to consist of the town school districts of Groton and Ryegate and the Wells River Graded School District, subject to the following agreement concerning the
board of school directors of such union district:

(a)
Board of School Directors. The board of school directors of the union school district shall consist of eight members, with three members coming from Groton, three from Ryegate, and two from Wells River.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1956
Brattleboro and Vernon each voted yes on the articles of agreement. Guilford and Putney also voted yes but voted not to send their 7th and 8th grade students to the Union District School.

1956
The Town School District of Dumerston requested and was granted admission to Union District Number 6 for grades 7-12.

2000
Articles of agreement were changed regarding apportionment of expenses.

ARTICLE 1

In the event, and only in the event that the Town School District of the Town of Brattleboro votes in favor of entering a Union Junior-Senior High School District, to see if the voters of the Town will vote to consolidate with one or more of the following
neighboring school districts — Brattleboro, Dummerston, Guilford, Putney or Newfane, for the purpose of forming and of becoming a member District in a Union Junior-Senior High School District pursuant to the authority contained
in No. 202 of the Acts of 1953 as amended, said Union Junior-Senior High School District to be organized and operated in accordance with the provisions of said act except as modified by the following agreements entered into by
the school districts forming said Union Junior-Senior High School District:

(a)
Said Union Junior-Senior High School District shall provide six years of secondary school education in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 12 for all towns which vote to become members of the Union Junior-Senior High School
District.

(b)
Said junior-senior high school shall provide school facilities for grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 such facilities to be located within the territorial limits of the Town of Brattleboro.

(c)
The Union Junior-Senior High School District shall provide such transportation as is necessary to transport Union Junior-Senior High School District pupils in grades 7 through 12 to and from Union Junior-Senior High
School District schools, such transportation to be limited to the transporting of pupils to and from such central points in member district towns and such other central points as shall be determined by the Union Junior-Senior High
School District Board of School Directors.

(d)
Student enrollment shall consist of all students residing in a member District and enrolled for the whole or a part of given school year in grades 7 through 12, or enrolled for all or part of such year in said grades
in any other school within said member District or elsewhere, except that students attending the 7th through 12th grades of a parochial or private school, including Leland and Grey Seminary, shall not be included, nor shall there
be included students attending the 7th and 8th grades in those member Districts which before the July 1, 1956, have voted not to send their 7th and 8th grade students to said Union Junior-Senior High School District schools. In
the event that a member District shall vote, subsequent to July 1, 1956, to send its 7th and 8th grade students to the Union Junior-Senior High School District schools and such vote is approved by the Union Junior-Senior High School
District, upon the recommendation of the Board of School Directors of the Union Junior-Senior High School District, then such member District shall send its 7th and 8th grade students to the Union Junior-Senior High School District
Schools and the student enrollment of such member District, as above defined, shall be amended so as to include such 7th and 8th grade students therein.

(e)
All expenses of the Junior High School grades 7 and 8, including transportation, building, maintaining and operating expenses shall be shared by and charged to the member Districts in the proportion which the grade
7 and 8 student enrollment as above defined, in each member District for the previous school year bears to the total number of grade 7 and 8 student enrollment, as above defined, for said year in all the Districts. All expenses
of the High School grades 9 through 12, including transportation, building, maintaining and operating expenses shall be shared by and charged to the member Districts in the proportion which the grades 9 through 12 student enrollment
as above defined, in each member District for the previous school year bears to the total number of grades 9 through 12 student enrollment, as above defined, for said year in all the Districts.

(f)
The School Board of said Union Junior-Senior High School District shall consist of Directors to be nominated by the member Districts at their respective annual meetings and elected at the annual Union Junior-Senior
High School District meeting. Each member District shall be entitled to one Director for each 100 students or fractional part thereof, students to be counted on the basis of student enrollment, as above defined for the previous
school year. It is further provided that a member District shall be entitled to a Director only if the student enrollment, as above defined, for the previous school year for that member District was 20 or more. Temporary School
Directors to serve for the period of time from the formation of this Union Junior-Senior High School District up to the first annual meeting of this Union Junior-Senior High School District shall be elected from the nominees of
the respective member Districts, said temporary school Directors to be nominated prior to the first meeting of the Union Junior-Senior High School District called by the Commissioner of Education, as provided for in No. 202 of
the Acts of 1953, as amended. Alternate school Directors may be nominated and elected in the same manner.

(g)
The Town School District of the Town of Brattleboro shall lease its present High School plant to the Union Junior-Senior High School District for an annual rental, payable on or before April 15 and October 15, sufficient
to retire the bonds issued by the School District of the Town of Brattleboro against this property as they become due, plus a sum sufficient so that said bonds, the Union Junior-Senior High School District shall have paid to the
School District of Brattleboro the total sum of $950,000, which is adjudged to be the fair market value of this property at this time, plus interest at 1 percent per annum on the outstanding balance due over the period of the lease,
and the Town Clerk of Brattleboro, at such time as the total sum of $950,000, plus interest is paid to the School District of Brattleboro by the Union Junior-Senior High School District shall transfer by deed the present Brattleboro
High School Property of the School District of Brattleboro, including the grandstand, to the Union Junior-Senior High School District.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1987
Castleton and Hubbardton voted yes to the following articles.

ARTICLES OF AGREEMENT

1.
The districts to be included in the proposed Union are Castleton and Hubbardton.

2.
Due to transportation, spatial and geographic considerations, no other district will participate in the union.

3.
The proposed union will operate grades K-8.

4.
There will be no need for the construction of a new school to accommodate the proposed union. The existing facilities in Castleton will be acquired by the proposed union.

5. a.
Transportation will be provided by the individual districts and their Boards.

b.
The teaching staff and curriculum that is presently in existence in the Castleton District on July 1, 1988 will be assumed by the proposed Union. The proposed Union shall assume all rights and obligations of the Castleton
School District under all master and individual contracts of employment on July 1, 1988.

6. a.
There shall be no debt assumed by the proposed union from the Hubbardton District.

b.
The proposed union shall assume the debt incurred by the Castleton District as of June 30, 1988 as defined on the addendum attached hereto.

7. a.
The Hubbardton School District, having no properties to contribute to the proposed union, will buy a percentage of the Castleton District. This in turn would be turned over to the proposed Union along with Castleton’s
share.

b.
The valuation of these properties is agreed to be $2,108,000.

c.
Hubbardton shall acquire its share of the Castleton properties by:

1. a.
paying to the Castleton School District 10% of the agreed value of buildings and properties owned by the Castleton School District, less debt owed by the Castleton School District as of July 1, 1988.

b.
paying to the Castleton School District 8% of $135,200.00 which is the insured value of the contents and inventory. (See attached statement of values.)

2.
Five years after the school year in which the Union is effected, figure a. shall be adjusted to directly represent the actual percentage of the Hubbardton student population of the total Union student population at
that time. Said adjustment shall be made by either an additional payment by Hubbardton to Castleton or a rebate from Castleton to Hubbardton. Neither party shall be charged interest during the interim.

8.
Capital and operating expenses shall be “divided among the two member districts in proportion which the student enrollment in each member district for the previous year bears to the total number of the students for
that year enrolled in all the districts together.” (Chapter 11 Article 3, Section 711) October 15 shall be the date for yearly evaluation.

9. a.
The directors of the proposed union shall be elected in compliance with requirements as defined in Chapter 11, Title 16, Section 706e.

b.
The directors shall be apportioned between Castleton and Hubbardton so that there be a director for each 350 registered voters or part thereof as listed on the check list of each Town in effect on October 15 of the
year preceding the year of election of directors.

10.
All directors shall, by the third year of the proposed Union, have three-year terms. The first two elections shall have staggered terms in compliance with Chapter 11, Title 16, Section 706b(10), and 706m.

11.
The proposed Union shall be submitted to the voters for approval March 3, 1987.

12.
If passed, the proposed union will assume control of Castleton School on and not before July l, 1988.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1962
Hinesburg, Williston and Shelburne each voted yes on the articles below.

1962
Charlotte requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

ARTICLE I

Shall the town school district join in the formation of a union high school district, as provided by law, to consist of the town school districts of Hinesburg, Williston and Shelburne, each of said districts to have a representation of two on the joint
school board?

ARTICLE II

Subject to affirmative vote of Article I, to designate two nominees to be representatives of the town school district on the board of school directors of the proposed union high school district, to serve until July 1 following the first annual meeting
of such union high school district.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1966
Andover and Chester each voted to accept the articles of agreement below.

1968
Andover and Chester voted to reduce the number of grades in the union district from 1-8 to 1-6.

ARTICLE I

Shall the Town School District join in the formation of a Union Elementary School District, as provided by law, to consist of the Town School Districts of Andover and Chester, subject to the following agreements as to the operation of such Union District.

(a)
Type of elementary school. The Union Elementary School District shall operate as an elementary school having courses in grades one through eight.

(b)
Location. The Union Elementary School, grades one through six, shall be located on the nine acre Chester Elementary School site on Main Street in Chester, Vermont.

(c)
Board of School Directors. The Board of School Directors of the Union Elementary School District shall consist of one member from the Town of Andover and four members from the Town of Chester.

(d)
Transportation. The elementary school students will be transported from each member district, and the cost of such transportation will be treated as a part of the operating expense of the Union Elementary School District.

(e)
Student Enrollment. Student enrollment shall only include all students residing in a member district and enrolled on October 15 of any school year in grades one through six.

(f)
Apportionment of Operating Expenses. The net operating cost of the Union Elementary School District, including operation and maintenance costs, after deduction of tuition receipts, State Aid, and other income, shall
be pro rated among the member districts in the same proportion which the student enrollment, as above defined, bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

(g)
Apportionment of Bonded Indebtedness. Andover’s annual share of the bonded indebtedness, including the present Chester Elementary School Bond and Bonding for the Proposed Addition, shall be 10% from the date of the
acceptance of this agreement to the final payment on the Bond for the Proposed Addition to the Chester Elementary School.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1964
Mount Tabor and Danby each voted yes on the following article:

Shall the town school district join in the formation of a union school district as provided by law to consist of the town school districts of Mount Tabor and Danby, the representation on the union school district board to be one member from the Mount
Tabor town school district and three members from the Danby town school district.

1984
According to the superintendent’s office, the structure of the union school district board was changed in 1984 to be five members from Danby and two members from Mount Tabor. However, we were unable to find a record
of a vote on this change.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1995
Essex Junction Incorporated School District the Essex Town School District both voted yes to the following articles and final report:

Shall the Essex Junction School District/Essex Town School District, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed Union High School District, join with the Essex Town School District/Essex Junction School District,
which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed Union High School District, for the purpose of forming a Union High School District, as provided in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon the
following conditions and agreements:

(a)

Class of schools.
The Union High School District shall operate and manage high school, offering instruction in grades nine through twelve, and the regional technical center.

(b)

Board of School Directors.
The Union High School District School Board representation shall be on a per capita basis with one school Board member for every 4,000 residents, or any portion thereof, in a given member District based on the most
recent decennial census. The initial representation shall be as follows:

Member 1900 Population Number of

District from U.S. Census School Board Members

Village of Essex Junction 8,396 3 Members

Town of Essex 8,102 3 Members

The representation shall be subject to reapportionment following each decennial census.

(c)

Apportionment of Expenses.
Annual capital and operating expenses of the Union High School District shall be allocated on a per pupil basis using the most current first 40 day average daily membership enrollment as reported to the State Department
of Education, excluding the regional technical center enrollment.

(d)

Assumption of ownership of school property.
The Union High School District shall assume the indebtedness, and acquire the school properties, as specified in the final report.

(e)

Final Report.
The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the eighteenth day of April, 1995, which is on file in the Office of the Clerk of the Essex Junction School District, Incorporated, shall
govern the Union High School District.

Final Report

706b(3) The class of schools to be operated.

Decision:
The class of school to be operated will be grades nine through twelve, including the regional vocational-technical education center.

706b(4) The cost and general location of any proposed new schools to be constructed.

Decision:
No new construction is planned upon formation of the proposed union.

706b(5) The transportation, teaching staff and curriculum to be provided.

Decision: